Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 10-1 to 10-16 designated as Part I by L 1994, c 283,
§2(1).

[§10-1] Declaration of purpose. (a)
The people of the State of Hawaii and the United States of America as set forth
and approved in the Admission Act, established a public trust which includes
among other responsibilities, betterment of conditions for native Hawaiians.
The people of the State of Hawaii reaffirmed their solemn trust obligation and
responsibility to native Hawaiians and furthermore declared in the state
constitution that there be an office of Hawaiian affairs to address the needs
of the aboriginal class of people of Hawaii.

(b) It shall be the duty and responsibility of
all state departments and instrumentalities of state government providing
services and programs which affect native Hawaiians and Hawaiians to actively
work toward the goals of this chapter and to cooperate with and assist wherever
possible the office of Hawaiian affairs. [L 1979, c 196, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next